Alaska, session 34, SB254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 43.23.028(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) By October 1 of each year, the commissioner shall give public notice of 06 the value of each permanent fund dividend for that year and notice of the information 07 required to be disclosed under (3) of this subsection. In addition, the stub attached to 08 each individual dividend disbursement advice must 09 (1) disclose the amount of each dividend attributable to income earned 10 by the permanent fund from deposits to that fund required under art. IX, sec. 15, 11 Constitution of the State of Alaska; 12 (2) disclose the amount of each dividend attributable to income earned 13 by the permanent fund from appropriations to that fund and from amounts added to 14 that fund to offset the effects of inflation; 01 (3) disclose the amount by which each dividend has been reduced due 02 to each appropriation from the dividend fund, including amounts to pay the costs of 03 administering the dividend program and the hold harmless provisions of 04 AS 43.23.240; 05 (4) include a statement that an individual is not eligible for a dividend 06 when 07 (A) during the qualifying year, the individual was convicted of 08 a felony; 09 (B) during all or part of the qualifying year, the individual was 10 incarcerated as a result of the conviction of a 11 (i) felony; or 12 (ii) misdemeanor if the individual has been convicted of 13 a prior felony or two or more prior misdemeanors; 14 (5) include a statement that the legislative purpose for making 15 individuals listed under (4) of this subsection ineligible is to 16 (A) provide funds for services for and payments to crime 17 victims and operating costs of the Violent Crimes Compensation Board; 18 (B) provide funds to pay restitution owed to crime victims; 19 (C) provide funds for grants to nonprofit organizations for 20 services for crime victims and for mental health services and substance abuse 21 treatment for offenders; 22 (D) provide funds for the office of victims' rights; 23 (E) provide funds to the Council on Domestic Violence and 24 Sexual Assault for grants for the operation of domestic violence and sexual 25 assault programs; and 26 (F) obtain reimbursement for some of the costs imposed on the 27 Department of Corrections related to incarceration or probation of those 28 individuals; 29 (6) disclose the total amount that would have been paid during the 30 previous fiscal year to individuals who were ineligible to receive dividends under 31 AS 43.23.005(d) if they had been eligible; 01 (7) disclose the total amount transferred or appropriated for the current 02 fiscal year under AS 43.23.048 for each of the accounts, funds, and agencies listed in 03 AS 43.23.048; 04 (8) disclose the total amount of appropriations for operating and 05 capital expenditures for the current fiscal year, including the total amount of 06 state funds and the total amount of federal receipts appropriated, and disclose 07 the amount resulting from dividing the total amount of appropriations for 08 operating and capital expenditures by the total number of dividends issued in the 09 current fiscal year; 10 (9) list the five departments that have the highest total 11 appropriations for operating and capital expenditures, ranking the departments 12 in order of total amount of appropriations, and disclose the total amount of state 13 operating and capital appropriations to those departments for the current fiscal 14 year, as well as the total amount of state funds and the total amount of federal 15 receipts appropriated for each department listed; 16 (10) disclose the total amount of federal and state revenue for the 17 current fiscal year, including the total amount of revenue from 18 (A) mineral lease rentals, royalties, royalty sale proceeds, 19 and federal mineral revenue sharing payments and bonuses received by 20 the state; 21 (B) the amount appropriated from the earnings reserve 22 account to the general fund under AS 37.13.145(e); 23 (C) federal receipts; and 24 (D) all other state revenue; and 25 (11) disclose the amount resulting from dividing the total amount 26 of federal and state revenue by the total number of dividends issued in the 27 current fiscal year. 28 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.